Illinois, session 104th, HB4349.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Parentage Act of 2015 is amended 5by changing Section 703 as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 46/703)7    Sec. 703. Parentage of child of assisted reproduction.8    (a) An individual who consents under this Section to 9assisted reproduction with the intent to be a parent of a child 10conceived by assisted reproduction is a parent of the child.11    (a-1) Any individual who is an intended parent must 12undergo and pass a comprehensive criminal background check and 13screening as described in this Section before any insemination 14or embryo transfer. Failure to do so waives any presumption 15that the person is the legal parent of any resulting child born 16through assisted reproduction. 17    (a-2) A comprehensive criminal background check and 18screening for intended parents must include, but is not 19limited to, the following: 20        (1) a criminal history check by fingerprints of the 21    person that are submitted to the Illinois State Police and 22    the Federal Bureau of Investigation for comparison to 23    their criminal history records or the National Crime   HB4349- 2 -LRB104 17689 JRC 31120 b1    Information Database, when applicable; 2        (2) a check of the child abuse and neglect tracking 3    system and other State child protection systems, or the 4    national registry, as appropriate, to determine whether an 5    individual is currently alleged or has been indicated as a 6    perpetrator of child abuse or neglect; and 7        (3) a check of the Illinois Sex Offender Registry and 8    the National Sex Offenders Registry, as appropriate.9    For intended parents who resided in another state in the 10preceding 10 years, the screening also must include a check of 11that other state's child abuse and neglect registry and the 12National Sex Offender Registry. 13    (b) The consent described in subsection (a) must be either 14of the following:15        (1) in a record signed before, on, or after the birth 16    of the child by the woman or individual who gave birth to 17    the child and by an individual who intends to be a parent 18    of the child; an acknowledgment of parentage under Section 19    301 is a record within the meaning of this subsection; or20        (2) in an agreement entered into before conception 21    that the woman or individual who gave birth to the child 22    and the individual who intends to be a parent of the child 23    intended they both would be a parent of the child.24    Failure to consent as required by paragraph (1) or (2) of 25subsection (b) does not preclude a court from finding consent 26to parent if the individual for the first 2 years of the   HB4349- 3 -LRB104 17689 JRC 31120 b1child's life, including any period of temporary absence, 2resided in the same household with the child and openly held 3out the child as the individual's child.4    (c) An individual who is an intended parent or the woman or 5individual who gave birth to the child may bring a proceeding 6for a judgment of parentage before or after the birth of the 7child. If the court finds that the individual who did not give 8birth consented under subsection (b) of this Section, the 9court shall enter a judgment of parentage declaring the 10individual to be the parent.11    (d) The woman or individual who will give or who gave birth 12to the child or an individual who is or claims to be a parent 13under this Section may commence an action before or after the 14birth of a child to obtain a judgment to declare that the 15intended parent or parents are the parent or parents of the 16resulting child immediately on birth of the child and order 17that parental rights and responsibilities vest exclusively in 18the intended parent or parents immediately on birth of the 19child. A judgment issued before the birth of the resulting 20child takes effect on the birth of the resulting child. The 21State, the Department, and the hospital where the child is or 22is expected to be born are not necessary parties to an action 23under this Section.24    (e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act or 25law, no individual who is an intended parent who has been 26convicted of or who has pled guilty to or nolo contendere to a   HB4349- 4 -LRB104 17689 JRC 31120 b1violation of the following offenses under the Criminal Code of 21961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or a similar statute in 3another jurisdiction, may be the legal parent of any resulting 4child from the use of assisted reproduction:5        (1) first degree murder in violation of paragraph (1) 6    or (2) of subsection (a) of Section 9-1 of the Criminal 7    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or conviction of 8    second degree murder in violation of subsection (a) of 9    Section 9-2 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 10    Code of 2012 of a parent of the child to be adopted;11        (2) first degree murder or second degree murder of any 12    child in violation of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 13    Criminal Code of 2012;14        (3) attempt or conspiracy to commit first degree 15    murder of any child in violation of the Criminal Code of 16    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;17        (4) solicitation to commit murder of any child, 18    solicitation to commit murder of any child for hire, or 19    solicitation to commit second degree murder of any child 20    in violation of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 21    Code of 2012;22        (5) predatory criminal sexual assault of a child in 23    violation of Section 11-1.40 or 12-14.1 of the Criminal 24    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;25        (6) heinous battery of any child in violation of the 26    Criminal Code of 1961;  HB4349- 5 -LRB104 17689 JRC 31120 b1        (7) aggravated battery of any child in violation of 2    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;3        (8) any violation of Section 11-1.20 or Section 12-13 4    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;5        (9) any violation of subsection (a) of Section 11-1.50 6    or Section 12-16 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 7    Criminal Code of 2012;8        (10) any violation of Section 11-9.1 of the Criminal 9    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;10        (11) any violation of Section 11-9.1A of the Criminal 11    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012; or12        (12) an offense in any other state the elements of 13    which are similar and bear a substantial relationship to 14    any of the enumerated offenses in this subsection.15(Source: P.A. 104-448, eff. 12-12-25.) 16    Section 10. The Gestational Surrogacy Act is amended by 17changing Sections 20 and 25 and by adding Section 25-1 as 18follows: 19    (750 ILCS 47/20)20    Sec. 20. Eligibility. 21    (a) A gestational surrogate shall be deemed to have 22satisfied the eligibility requirements of this Act if, at the 23time the gestational surrogacy agreement is executed, the 24gestational surrogate:  HB4349- 6 -LRB104 17689 JRC 31120 b1        (1) is at least 21 years of age;2        (2) has given birth to at least one child;3        (3) has completed a medical evaluation;4        (4) has completed a mental health evaluation;5        (5) has had and will have ongoing legal representation 6    by independent counsel, licensed in Illinois and chosen by 7    the surrogate, throughout the course of the gestational 8    surrogacy arrangement regarding the terms of the 9    gestational surrogacy agreement and the potential 10    consequences of the gestational surrogacy; and11        (6) has obtained a health insurance policy that covers 12    major medical treatments and hospitalization and the 13    health insurance policy has a term that extends throughout 14    the duration of the expected pregnancy and for 8 weeks 15    after the birth of the child; provided, however, that the 16    policy may be procured by the intended parents on behalf 17    of the gestational surrogate pursuant to the gestational 18    surrogacy agreement.19    (b) The intended parent or parents shall be deemed to have 20satisfied the eligibility requirements of this Act if, at the 21time the gestational surrogacy agreement is executed, the 22intended parent or parents:23        (1) is at least 21 years of age;24        (2) are experiencing infertility as defined in 25    subsection (c) of Section 356m of the Illinois Insurance 26    Code;  HB4349- 7 -LRB104 17689 JRC 31120 b1        (3) have completed a mental health evaluation; and2        (4) has had and will have ongoing legal representation 3    by independent counsel, licensed in Illinois, throughout 4    the course of the gestational surrogacy arrangement 5    regarding the terms of the gestational surrogacy agreement 6    and the potential legal consequences of the gestational 7    surrogacy; and .8        (5) he, she, or they have undergone and passed a 9    comprehensive criminal background check and screening as 10    described in Subsection (c) before the commencement of any 11    medical procedures (other than medical or mental health 12    evaluations necessary to determine eligibility of the 13    parties under Section 20 of this Act).14    (c) A comprehensive criminal background check and 15screening for intended parents must include, but is not 16limited to, the following:17        (1) a criminal history check by fingerprints of the 18    person that are submitted to the Illinois State Police and 19    the Federal Bureau of Investigation for comparison to 20    their criminal history records or the National Crime 21    Information Database, when applicable;22        (2) a check of the child abuse and neglect tracking 23    system and other state child protection systems, or the 24    national registry, as appropriate, to determine whether an 25    individual is currently alleged or has been indicated as a 26    perpetrator of child abuse or neglect; and  HB4349- 8 -LRB104 17689 JRC 31120 b1        (3) a check of the Illinois Sex Offender Registry and 2    the National Sex Offenders Registry, as appropriate. 3(Source: P.A. 104-448, eff. 12-12-25.) 4    (750 ILCS 47/25-1 new)5    Sec. 25-1. Grounds for disqualification of intended 6parents.7    (a) Any individual who is an intended parent and refuses 8to undergo a comprehensive criminal background check and 9screening as described in Section 20 shall be deemed not to 10have satisfied and met the eligibility requirements of this 11Act.12    (b) In addition, any individual who is an intended parent 13and has been convicted of or who has pled guilty to or nolo 14contendere to a violation of the following offenses under the 15Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or a 16similar statute in another jurisdiction, is deemed not to have 17satisfied and met the eligibility requirements of this Act:18        (1) first degree murder in violation of paragraph (1) 19    or (2) of subsection (a) of Section 9-1 of the Criminal 20    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or conviction of 21    second degree murder in violation of subsection (a) of 22    Section 9-2 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 23    Code of 2012 of a parent of the child to be adopted;24        (2) first degree murder or second degree murder of any 25    child in violation of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the   HB4349- 9 -LRB104 17689 JRC 31120 b1    Criminal Code of 2012;2        (3) attempt or conspiracy to commit first degree 3    murder or second degree murder of any child in violation 4    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;5        (4) solicitation to commit murder of any child, 6    solicitation to commit murder of any child for hire, or 7    solicitation to commit second degree murder of any child 8    in violation of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 9    Code of 2012;10        (5) predatory criminal sexual assault of a child in 11    violation of Section 11-1.40 or 12-14.1 of the Criminal 12    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;13        (6) heinous battery of any child in violation of the 14    Criminal Code of 1961;15        (7) aggravated battery of any child in violation of 16    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;17        (8) any violation of Section 11-1.20 or Section 12-13 18    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;19        (9) any violation of subsection (a) of Section 11-1.50 20    or Section 12-16 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 21    Criminal Code of 2012;22        (10) any violation of Section 11-9.1 of the Criminal 23    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;24        (11) any violation of Section 11-9.1A of the Criminal 25    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012; or26        (12) an offense in any other state the elements of   HB4349- 10 -LRB104 17689 JRC 31120 b1    which are similar and bear a substantial relationship to 2    any of the enumerated offenses in this subsection. 3    Section 15. The Illinois Fertility Fraud Act is amended by 4adding Section 20-1 as follows: 5    (815 ILCS 540/20-1 new)6    Sec. 20-1. Negligent failure to screen intended parents. A 7child born as a result of assisted reproductive treatment may 8bring an action against any health care provider that:9        (1) failed to conduct a comprehensive criminal 10    background check and screening of the child's intended 11    parents as required by Section 703 of the Illinois 12    Parentage Act of 2015 that would have revealed that the 13    intended parent had been convicted of or pled guilty to or 14    nolo contendere to any of the violations described in that 15    Section; and16        (2) that child later suffered sexual abuse or sexual 17    assault by that intended parent.